test/src/morphology/sms-test-V-aaveed.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sms/bin/sms-gen.hfstol
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sms/bin/isms.fst
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ääˊveed: # Verb 'to open' - full paradigm
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ääˊvääm
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ääˊvääk
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ääˊvad
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ääˊveep
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ääˊvveˊted
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ääˊvee 
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+4: ääˊveet
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ääˊveem
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ääˊviiǩ
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ääˊvii
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ääˊviim, ääˊviin]
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ääˊviid
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ääˊvee
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+4: ääˊveeš
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Sg1: ääˊveˊžem
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Sg2: ääˊveˊžiǩ
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Sg3: ääˊveež
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Pl1: [ääˊveˊžep, ääˊveˊžim]
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Pl2: ääˊveˊžid 
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Pl3: ääˊveˊže
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+4: ääˊveˊžet
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+ConNeg: ääˊveˊže
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Sg1: ääˊveˊčem
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Sg2: ääˊveˊčiǩ
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Sg3: ääˊveˊči
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Pl1: [ääˊveˊčim, ääˊveˊčep]
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Pl2: ääˊveˊčid
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Pl3: ääˊveˊče
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+4: ääˊveˊčeš
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+ConNeg: ääˊveˊče
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Sg2: ääˊved
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Sg3: ääˊvââǥǥas
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Pl1: ääˊvâkap
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Pl2: ääˊveˊǩed
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Pl3: ääˊvâkaz
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+ConNeg: ääˊvukku
     ääˊveed+V+ActEss: ääˊveˊmen
     ääˊveed+V+Action: ääˊveem
     ääˊveed+V+PrsPrc: ääˊveei
     ääˊveed+V+PrfPrc: ääˊvääm
     ääˊveed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [ääˊvummu, ääˊvuum]
     ääˊveed+V+VAbess: ääˊveǩâni
     ääˊveed+V+GerTemp: ääˊveen
     ääˊveed+V+GerInstr: ääˊveeˊl
